Wisconsin, session 2025, AB339.
do enact as follows:AB339,11Section 1. 20.255 (2) (dt) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB339,2,3220.255 (2) (dt) (title) School-based Aid for comprehensive school mental health 3services grants.AB339,24Section 2. 115.367 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB339,2,65115.367 Aid for comprehensive school mental health services. (1) In 6this section, “telehealth” has the meaning given in s. 440.01 (1) (hm).AB339,2,127(2) Beginning in the 2025-26 school year and annually thereafter, the state 8superintendent shall, from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (dt) and subject to 9sub. (4), reimburse a school board or the operator of a charter school established 10under s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x) for expenditures relating to mental health services 11provided during in-school or out-of-school time. Mental health services eligible for 12reimbursement under this subsection include at least all of the following:AB339,2,1313(a) Mental health evidence-based improvement strategies.AB339,2,1514(b) Mental health literacy and stigma reduction programs for pupils and 15adults.AB339,2,1816(c) Collaborating or contracting with community mental health providers, 17consultants, organizations, cooperative educational service agencies, and other 18experts to provide consultation, training, mentoring, and coaching.AB339,2,1919(d) Parent training and informational events.AB339,2,2020(e) Assistance programs for pupils and families.AB339,2,2121(f) Mental health navigators.AB339,2,2222(g) Mental health system planning.AB339,3,11(h) Translator and interpreter services.AB339,3,32(i) Offsetting the costs associated with school-employed mental health 3professionals accessible to all pupils.AB339,3,54(j) The costs of setting up spaces and purchasing equipment suitable for 5mental health telehealth service delivery.AB339,3,86(k) The costs of projects designed to assist minors experiencing problems 7resulting from the use of alcohol or other drugs or to prevent alcohol or other drug 8use by minors.AB339,3,99(L) Telehealth services.AB339,3,1010(3) The following costs are ineligible for reimbursement under sub. (2):AB339,3,1111(a) Payments for direct treatment services or insurance deductibles.AB339,3,1212(b) Nonmental health–related training.AB339,3,1313(c) Staff salaries for nonmental health–related positions.AB339,3,1514(d) Indirect costs of regular school operations such as existing overhead 15expenses.AB339,3,1816(4) (a) In each school year, the amount the state superintendent reimburses a 17school board or operator of an independent charter school under sub. (2) may not 18exceed the greater of the following:AB339,3,19191. $100,000.AB339,3,21202. $100 multiplied by the number of pupils enrolled in the school district or 21charter school in the previous school year.AB339,4,222(b) If the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (dt) in any fiscal year is insufficient 23to pay the full amount of reimbursement under sub. (2), the state superintendent 1shall prorate state aid payments among the school boards and the operators of 2charter schools established under s. 118.40 (2r) and (2x) that are eligible for the aid.AB339,33Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB339,4,74(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 5of public instruction under s. 20.255 (2) (dt), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-626 is increased by $83,888,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 7increased by $83,888,000.AB339,48Section 4. Effective date.AB339,4,109(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 10publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB339,4,1111